Colorado, session 2025B, HB1002.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly oft he State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) (I) The purpose of defining listed jurisdictions for purposes of
corporate income tax is to decrease corporate income tax avoidance in
Colorado. This is a continuation of existing tax policy.
(II) Additional foreign jurisdictions must be included in the current
list to accurately reflect the foreign jurisdictions that are used by C
corporations for the purpose of tax avoidance.
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(III) The clarification of listed jurisdictions will decrease tax
avoidance by creating a more accurate list of foreign jurisdictions used by
C corporations for the purpose of tax avoidance.
(b) (I) In 2017, as part of the federal "Tax Cuts and Jobs Act",
Pub.L. 115-97, Congress created the Foreign-Derived Intangible Income
("FDII") tax deduction. Federal Public Law 119-21 lowered the rate for the
FDII deduction and renamed it the foreign-derived deduction eligible
income ("FDDEI") tax deduction for taxable years beginning after
December 31, 2025.
(II) The FDDEI deduction provides a tax benefit to corporations that
do business outside of the United States. Such corporations also receive
other substantial tax reductions from other Colorado tax laws. In addition,
most FDDEI deductions claimed for state income tax purposes are claimed
by corporations that maintain the majority of their property and investments
outside of Colorado.
(III) The primary purpose of adding the FDDEI deduction back to
taxable income for state income tax purposes is to encourage tax
compliance by promoting tax simplicity, equalization, and fairness. The
revenue gain from this add-back is incidental to the primary purpose of
encouraging tax compliance and promoting tax simplicity, equalization, and
fairness for Colorado taxpayers.
(IV) Any revenue gam resulting from the FDDEI deduction
add-back is de minimis.
( c) Therefore, consistent with the Colorado supreme court's holding
in TABOR Found. v. Reg'! Transp. Dist., 2018 CO 29, that legislation that
causes only an incidental and de minimis tax revenue increase does not
amount to a new tax or a tax policy change that requires advance voter
approval under section 20 of article X of the Colorado constitution, the
FDDEI deduction add-back is neither a new tax nor a tax policy change that
requires voter approval.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-22-303, amend
(8)(b)(II) and (12)(b) as follows:
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 25B-1002

39-22-303. Dividends in a combined report - foreign source
income - affiliated groups - definitions - rules - repeal. (8) (b) (II) A C
corporation is presumptively incorporated in a foreign jurisdiction for the
purpose of tax avoidance if it is incorporated in a listed jurisdiction. A C
corporation is not incorporated in a foreign jurisdiction for the purpose of
tax avoidance if the taxpayer proves to the satisfaction of the executive
director, OR IF THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR DETERMINES, that such corporation
is incorporated in a listed jurisdiction for reasons that meet the economic
substance doctrine described in section 770 I ( o) of the internal revenue
code.
(12) As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:
(b) "Listed jurisdiction" means:
(I) FOR INCOME TAX YEARS COMMENCING BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2026,
Andorra, Anguilla, Antigua and Barbuda, Aruba, the Bahamas, Bahrain,
Barbados, Belize, Bermuda, Bonaire, British Virgin Islands, Cayman
Islands, Cook Islands, Curac;ao, Cyprus, Dominica, Gibraltar, Grenada,
Guernsey-Sark-Alderney, Isle ofMan, Jersey, Liberia, Luxembourg, Malta,
Marshall Islands, Mauritius, Monaco, Montserrat, Nauru, Niue, Panama,
Saba, Samoa, San Marino, Seychelles, Sint Eustatius, Sint Maarten, St.
Kitts and Nevis, St. Lucia, St. Vincent and the Grenadines, Turks and
Caicos Islands, U.S. Virgin Islands, and Vanuatu; AND
(II) FOR INCOME TAX YEARS COMMENCING ON OR AFTER JANUARY
1, 2026, THE JURISDICTIONS LISTED IN SUBSECTION (12)(b)(I) OF THIS
SECTION AND HONG KONG, REPUBLIC OF IRELAND, LIECHTENSTEIN,
NETHERLANDS, AND SINGAPORE.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-22-304, amend
(3)U) and (3)(q)(II); and add (2)(1) as follows:
39-22-304. Net income of corporation - legislative declaration -
definitions - repeal. (2) There shall be added to federal taxable income:
(I) FOR INCOME TAX YEARS COMMENCING ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1,
2026, AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO A FEDERAL DEDUCTION CLAIMED FOR THE
INCOME TAX YEAR FOR FOREIGN-DERIVED DEDUCTION ELIGIBLE INCOME
PURSUANT TO SECTION 250 OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE.
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 25B-1002

(3) There shall be subtracted from federal taxable income:
U) Any amount treated as a section 78 dividend under section 78 of
the internal revenue code; excluding any amount treated under section 78
as a dividend received ftom a C e01poration ine01p01ated in a fureign
jurisdiction for the pmpose of tax avoidance pursuant to section 39-22-303
(8)(b)(II)
(q) (II) The amount of any global intangible low-taxed income
included in federal taxable income pursuant to section 95 IA (a) of the
internal revenue code with respect to a controlled foreign corporation that
is a C corporation incorporated in a foreign jurisdiction for the purpose of
tax avoidance pursuant to section 39-22-303 (8)(b )(II), less any amount
deducted under section 250 (a)(l)(B) of the internal revenue code with
respect to such global intangible low-taxed income.
SECTION 4. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 25B-1002

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
Ju~ James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
Co~ Esther van Mourik
ACTING CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED on "Thvv-sd C\i Jqv~vst 2.<ofh 2J)2_S P\1' q :4 S-0tm
(Date and Time)
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 25B-1002